Indiana, session 2026, HB1301.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-35.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 35.4. "Certificate", for purposes
of IC 35-38-1-17.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-38-1-17.5(a).
SECTION 2. IC 35-38-1-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Notwithstanding IC 1-1-5.5-21, this section
applies to a person who:
(1) commits an offense; or
(2) is sentenced;
before July 1, 2014.
(b) This section does not apply to a credit restricted felon.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (k) and (m), this section does
not apply to a violent criminal.
(d) As used in this section, "violent criminal" means a person
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


convicted of any of the following offenses:
(1) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(2) Attempted murder (IC 35-41-5-1).
(3) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(4) Involuntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-4).
(5) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(6) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(7) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(8) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(9) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(10) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(11) Sexual misconduct with a minor as a Class A felony under
IC 35-42-4-9(a)(2) or a Class B felony under IC 35-42-4-9(b)(2)
(for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or sexual misconduct
with a minor as a Level 1 felony under IC 35-42-4-9(a)(2) or a
Level 2 felony under IC 35-42-4-9(b)(2) (for a crime committed
after June 30, 2014).
(12) Robbery as a Class A felony or a Class B felony (IC
35-42-5-1) (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or robbery
as a Level 2 felony or a Level 3 felony (IC 35-42-5-1) (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
(13) Burglary as Class A felony or a Class B felony (IC
35-43-2-1) (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or
burglary as a Level 1 felony, Level 2 felony, Level 3 felony, or
Level 4 felony (IC 35-43-2-1) (for a crime committed after June
30, 2014).
(14) Unlawful possession of a firearm by a serious violent felon
(IC 35-47-4-5).
(e) Notwithstanding section 17.5 of this chapter, at any time after:
(1) a convicted person begins serving the person's sentence; and
(2) the court obtains a report from the department of correction
concerning the convicted person's conduct while imprisoned;
the court may reduce or suspend the sentence and impose a sentence
that the court was authorized to impose at the time of sentencing.
However, if the convicted person was sentenced under the terms of a
plea agreement, the court may not, without the consent of the
prosecuting attorney, reduce or suspend the sentence and impose a
sentence not authorized by the plea agreement. The court must
incorporate its reasons in the record.
(f) If the court sets a hearing on a petition under this section, the
court must give notice to the prosecuting attorney and the prosecuting
attorney must give notice to the victim (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-348)
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


of the crime for which the convicted person is serving the sentence.
(g) The court may suspend a sentence for a felony under this section
only if suspension is permitted under IC 35-50-2-2.2, or, if applicable,
IC 35-50-2-2 (repealed).
(h) The court may deny a request to suspend or reduce a sentence
under this section without making written findings and conclusions.
(i) The court is not required to conduct a hearing before reducing or
suspending a sentence under this section if:
(1) the prosecuting attorney has filed with the court an agreement
of the reduction or suspension of the sentence; and
(2) the convicted person has filed with the court a waiver of the
right to be present when the order to reduce or suspend the
sentence is considered.
(j) This subsection applies only to a convicted person who is not a
violent criminal. A convicted person who is not a violent criminal may
file a petition for sentence modification under this section:
(1) not more than one (1) time in any three hundred sixty-five
(365) day period; and
(2) a maximum of two (2) times during any consecutive period of
incarceration;
without the consent of the prosecuting attorney.
(k) This subsection applies to a convicted person who is a violent
criminal. Except as provided in subsection (n), a convicted person who
is a violent criminal may, not later than three hundred sixty-five (365)
days from the date of sentencing, file one (1) petition for sentence
modification under this section without the consent of the prosecuting
attorney. After the elapse of the three hundred sixty-five (365) day
period, a violent criminal may not file a petition for sentence
modification without the consent of the prosecuting attorney.
(l) A person may not waive the right to sentence modification under
this section as part of a plea agreement. Any purported waiver of the
right to sentence modification under this section in a plea agreement is
invalid and unenforceable as against public policy. This subsection
does not prohibit the finding of a waiver of the right to:
(1) have a court modify a sentence and impose a sentence not
authorized by the plea agreement, as described under subsection
(e); or
(2) sentence modification for any other reason, including failure
to comply with the provisions of this section.
(m) Notwithstanding subsection (k), a person who commits an
offense after June 30, 2014, and before May 15, 2015, may file one (1)
petition for sentence modification without the consent of the
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


prosecuting attorney, even if the person has previously filed a petition
for sentence modification.
(n) A person sentenced in a criminal court having jurisdiction over
an offense committed when the person was less than eighteen (18)
years of age may file an additional petition for sentence modification
under this section without the consent of the prosecuting attorney if the
person has served at least:
(1) fifteen (15) years of the person's sentence, if the person is not
serving a sentence for murder; or
(2) twenty (20) years of the person's sentence, if the person is
serving a sentence for murder.
The time periods described in this subsection are computed on the
basis of time actually served and do not include any reduction applied
for good time credit or educational credit time.
SECTION 3. IC 35-38-1-17.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17.5. (a) As used in this section,
"certificate" means a certificate of eligibility for rehabilitative
release issued under subsection (b).
(b) The department of correction shall issue a certificate of
eligibility for rehabilitative release to a convicted person if one of
the following applies:
(1) The person is serving a sentence that does not include a
conviction under IC 35-42-1-1 (murder) and the person:
(A) is at least sixty (60) years of age; and
(B) has served at least twenty (20) years in the custody of
the department of correction for the current sentence.
(2) The person is serving a sentence for a conviction under
IC 35-42-1-1 (murder) and the person:
(A) is at least sixty-two (62) years of age; and
(B) has served at least thirty (30) years in the custody of
the department of correction for the current sentence.
The time periods described in this subsection are computed on the
basis of time actually served and do not include a reduction for
good time credit or educational credit time. This section does not
apply to a convicted person sentenced to death or life
imprisonment without parole.
(c) Not less than sixty (60) days before issuing a certificate under
subsection (b), the department of correction shall send a written
notice to the parole board of the department of correction's intent
to issue a certificate to the convicted person.
(d) Notwithstanding section 17 of this chapter, a convicted
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


person who has received a certificate under this section may file a
petition for sentence modification without the consent of the
prosecuting attorney. A convicted person may petition for
modification only one (1) time under this section and must include
a copy of the certificate with the petition.
(e) Upon receipt of a petition filed properly under this section,
the court shall set the matter for a hearing and provide notice of
the hearing to the convicted person and the department of
correction. A court may not set a hearing under this subsection less
than ninety (90) days from receipt of the petition.
(f) Unless the victim or a witness has requested in writing not to
be notified, the department of correction shall send a notice of the
hearing to:
(1) the victim of the convicted person (or the next of kin of the
victim if the conviction resulted from the death of the victim);
and
(2) any witness involved in the prosecution of the convicted
person;
and notify the individual described in subdivision (1) or (2) that the
individual may appear in person to testify at the hearing or may
submit written testimony to the court.
(g) The court shall consider the following factors when ruling on
a petition filed under this section:
(1) The age of the convicted person at the time the offense was
committed and at the time of the hearing.
(2) The convicted person's criminal history and conduct
during incarceration.
(3) Testimony or statements from the victim, the victim's
family, or any witnesses.
(4) Any medical or psychological reports concerning the
convicted person.
(5) The seriousness of the underlying offense and the role of
the convicted person in that offense.
(6) The benefits of potential reunification of the convicted
person with the convicted person's family.
(7) The fiscal impact of the convicted person being
incarcerated versus being released.
(8) The feasibility of the convicted person's reentry plan,
including housing, employment, and community support.
(h) Notwithstanding any statutory imposed minimum sentences,
if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
(1) the convicted person is no longer a danger to public safety;
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


(2) the convicted person has demonstrated significant
rehabilitative efforts, including participation in educational,
vocational, and therapeutic programs; and
(3) the interest of justice supports sentence modification;
the court may modify or suspend the convicted person's sentence.
(i) An order issued under subsection (h) is a final appealable
order and must:
(1) include findings on each factor described in subsection
(h)(1) through (h)(3);
(2) require the convicted person to remain on parole
supervision for at least five (5) years from the date the
convicted person is released from the custody of the
department of correction; and
(3) require the convicted person to remain in the custody of
the department of correction until all appeals are exhausted
and completed.
(j) A convicted person is entitled to representation by the state
public defender on a petition filed under this section.
SECTION 4. IC 35-38-1-34 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 34. (a) The following may file a petition for sentence
reduction under this section:
(1) A convicted person who:
(A) is serving a sentence within the department of
correction for an offense that was committed when the
convicted person was less than twenty-six (26) years of age;
and
(B) has served not less than ten (10) years of the convicted
person's sentence.
(2) A convicted person who:
(A) is serving a sentence within the department of
correction for an offense that was committed when the
convicted person was at least twenty-six (26) years of age;
and
(B) has served not less than fifteen (15) years of the
convicted person's sentence.
(3) Any convicted person with the consent of the prosecuting
attorney.
The time periods described in this subsection are computed on the
basis of time actually served and do not include a reduction for
good time credit or educational credit time. This section does not
apply to a convicted person sentenced to death or life
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


imprisonment without parole.
(b) The department of correction shall provide notice describing
the relief available under this section to the following:
(1) A convicted person described in subsection (a)(1) when the
convicted person has served at least nine (9) years in the
department of correction.
(2) A convicted person described in subsection (a)(2) when the
convicted person has served at least fourteen (14) years in the
department of correction.
(c) Notwithstanding sections 17 and 17.5 of this chapter, the
following may file a petition for sentence reduction under this
section:
(1) A convicted person described in subsection (a).
(2) A next friend or guardian of the convicted person.
(3) A treating healthcare provider of the convicted person.
(4) Counsel for the convicted person.
(d) A petition for sentence reduction must be filed with the
sentencing court and must contain:
(1) the name of the convicted person;
(2) the name of the petitioner and relationship of the
petitioner to the convicted person, if different from the
convicted person;
(3) the underlying criminal cause number and all offenses for
which the convicted person is serving a sentence;
(4) the date the convicted person was sentenced; and
(5) a description of:
(A) which sentence the convicted person seeks to be
reduced; and
(B) evidence that supports the request for sentence
reduction.
The petitioner shall serve the petition upon the department of
correction and the prosecuting attorney.
(e) A court may dismiss, without prejudice, a petition filed
under this section that does not comply with the requirements of
subsection (d). Upon receipt of a petition filed in compliance with
subsection (d), the court shall:
(1) unless impracticable, set a hearing not later than forty-five
(45) days after the petition is filed;
(2) serve notice of the hearing on:
(A) the petitioner;
(B) the convicted person, if different from the petitioner;
(C) counsel for the convicted person;
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149


(D) the department of correction;
(E) the prosecuting attorney; and
(F) the victim of the convicted person (or the next of kin of
the victim if the conviction resulted from the death of the
victim), and any witness involved in the prosecution of the
convicted person, unless the victim or a witness has
requested in writing not to be notified; and
(3) appoint a public defender to represent the convicted
person if the convicted person is not represented by counsel.
A request for a continuance of a hearing scheduled under
subdivision (1) may be granted for good cause shown. An
individual described in subdivision (2)(F) must be notified that the
individual may appear in person to testify at the hearing or may
submit written testimony to the court.
(f) At a hearing on a petition for sentence reduction filed under
this section, the court shall consider the following:
(1) Rehabilitative efforts taken by the convicted person,
including the convicted person's participation in educational,
therapeutic, and vocational opportunities within the
department of correction.
(2) The length of the convicted person's sentence in
proportion to the risk the convicted person is to the
community.
(3) All other evidence and testimony presented in support or
opposition of the petition.
(g) If the evidence supports that the convicted person does not
present a significant safety risk to the community, there is a
rebuttable presumption that the convicted person's remaining
sentence should be reduced by not less than twenty percent (20%).
The court shall issue a final appealable order with findings of fact
to support the sentence reduction or the denial of the petition. If a
petition is granted, the court shall include:
(1) all time served;
(2) good time credit; and
(3) educational credit;
when calculating the sentence reduction.
2026 IN 1301—LS 6989/DI 149